Hawaii statutes.
[§414-285] Amendment before issuance of
shares. If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its incorporators or
board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation's
articles of incorporation. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next